Utah, session 2026, SB15.
Section 1. Section 17-62-404 is amended to read:17-62-404. Plan may propose changing forms of county government -- Partisan elections.(1)(a)The optional plan proponent described in Subsection 17-62-403(1) shall ensure that each optional plan proposes changing the form of county government to:(i)for a county of the first, second, third, or fourth class:(A)the county commission form under Section 17-62-201;(B)the expanded county commission form under Section 17-62-202;(C)the county executive and council form under Section 17-62-203; or(D)the council-manager form under Section 17-62-204; and(ii)for a county of the fifth or sixth class:(A)the county commission form under Section 17-62-201; or(B)the expanded county commission form under Section 17-62-202.(b)The optional plan proponent described in Subsection 16-62-403(1) may not recommend an optional plan that:(i)proposes changing the form of government to a form not authorized in Subsection (1)(a);(ii)provides for the nonpartisan election of elected officers;(iii)imposes a limit on the number of terms or years that an elected officer may serve; or(iv)provides for elected officers to be subject to a recall election; or(v)provides, in a county with a population of 225,000 or more, for a full-time county commission in an expanded county commission form of government under Section 17-62-202..(2)A county that provides for the election of the county's elected officers through a partisan election may not change to a process that provides for the election of the county's elected officers through a nonpartisan election.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 17-62-504 is amended to read:17-62-504. Amendment of optional plan.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), an optional plan, after going into effect following an election held under Section 17-62-501, may be amended by an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the county legislative body.(2)Notwithstanding Subsection (1), an amendment to an optional plan that is in effect may not take effect until a majority of registered voters voting in a general or special election at which the amendment is proposed approve the amendment, if the amendment changes:(a)the size or makeup of the legislative body, except for adjustments necessary due to decennial reapportionment; or (b)the distribution of powers between the executive and legislative branches of county government; or(c)the status of the county executive or legislative body from full-time to part-time or vice versa.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.